Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Perfection.

§ 8.9A-308.
When security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; continuity of perfection.

Perfection of security interest. Except as otherwise provided in this section and §

8.9A-309

, a security interest is perfected if it has attached and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in §§

8.9A-310

through

8.9A-316

have been satisfied. A security interest is perfected when it attaches if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the security interest attaches.

Perfection of agricultural lien. An agricultural lien is perfected if it has become effective and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in §

8.9A-310

have been satisfied. An agricultural lien is perfected when it becomes effective if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the agricultural lien becomes effective.

Continuous perfection; perfection by different methods. A security interest or agricultural lien is perfected continuously if it is originally perfected by one method under this title and is later perfected by another method under this title, without an intermediate period when it was unperfected.

Supporting obligation. Perfection of a security interest in collateral also perfects a security interest in a supporting obligation for the collateral.

Lien securing right to payment. Perfection of a security interest in a right to payment or performance also perfects a security interest in a security interest, mortgage, or other lien on personal or real property securing the right.

Security entitlement carried in securities account. Perfection of a security interest in a securities account also perfects a security interest in the security entitlements carried in the securities account.

Commodity contract carried in commodity account. Perfection of a security interest in a commodity account also perfects a security interest in the commodity contracts carried in the commodity account.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-302; 1973, c. 509; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 1997, c. 343; 2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 97.1, 101.1.

§ 8.9A-309.
Security interest perfected upon attachment.

The following security interests are perfected when they attach:

a purchase-money security interest in consumer goods, except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-311 (b)

with respect to consumer goods that are subject to a statute or treaty described in §

8.9A-311 (a)

;

an assignment of accounts or payment intangibles which does not by itself or in conjunction with other assignments to the same assignee transfer a significant part of the assignor’s outstanding accounts or payment intangibles;

a sale of a payment intangible;

a sale of a promissory note;

a security interest created by the assignment of a health-care-insurance receivable to the provider of the health-care goods or services;

a security interest arising under §§

8.2-401

,

8.2-505

,

8.2-711 (3)

, or §

8.2A-508 (5)

, until the debtor obtains possession of the collateral;

a security interest of a collecting bank arising under §

8.4-210

;

a security interest of an issuer or nominated person arising under §

8.5A-118

;

a security interest arising in the delivery of a financial asset under §

8.9A-206 (c)

;

a security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary;

a security interest in a commodity contract or a commodity account created by a commodity intermediary;

an assignment for the benefit of all creditors of the transferor and subsequent transfers by the assignee thereunder; and

a security interest created by an assignment of a beneficial interest in a decedent’s estate.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-302; 1966, c. 569; 1973, c. 509; 1983, cc. 204, 367; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216, §§ 8.9-115, 8.9-116; 2000, c. 1007.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

§ 8.9A-310.
When filing required to perfect security interest or agricultural lien; security interests and agricultural liens to which filing provisions do not apply.

General rule; perfection by filing. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) and §

8.9A-312 (b)

, a financing statement must be filed to perfect all security interests and agricultural liens.

Exceptions; filing not necessary. The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to perfect a security interest:

that is perfected under §

8.9A-308 (d)

, (e), (f), or (g);

that is perfected under §

8.9A-309

when it attaches;

in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in §

8.9A-311 (a)

;

in goods in possession of a bailee that is perfected under §

8.9A-312 (d)

(1) or (2);

in certificated securities, documents, goods, or instruments that is perfected without filing, control, or possession under §

8.9A-312 (e)

, (f), or (g);

in collateral in the secured party’s possession under §

8.9A-313

;

in a certificated security which is perfected by delivery of the security certificate to the secured party under §

8.9A-313

;

in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights which is perfected by control under §

8.9A-314

;

in proceeds which is perfected under §

8.9A-315

; or

that is perfected under §

8.9A-316

.

Assignment of perfected security interest. If a secured party assigns a perfected security interest or agricultural lien, a filing under this title is not required to continue the perfected status of the security interest against creditors of and transferees from the original debtor.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-302; 1966, c. 569; 1973, c. 509; 1983, cc. 204, 367; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “control” in subdivision (b)(5); inserted “electronic documents” in subdivision (b)(8); and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note, “Perfection of Purchase Money Security Interests in Mobile Homes under Section 9-302 of the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 29 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 53 (1972).

For article, “The Purchase Money Security Interest in Inventory Versus the After-Acquired Property Interest — A ‘No Win’ Situation,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1986).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 101.3.

§ 8.9A-311.
Perfection of security interests in property subject to certain statutes, regulations, and treaties.

Security interest subject to other law. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), the filing of a financing statement is not necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property subject to:

a statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States whose requirements for a security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property preempt §

8.9A-310 (a)

;

a statute of the Commonwealth covering automobiles or other goods, which provides for a security interest to be indicated on a certificate of title as a condition to or result of perfection of the security interest; or

a statute of another jurisdiction which provides for a security interest to be indicated on a certificate of title as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property.

Compliance with other law. Compliance with the requirements of a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) for obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing statement under this title. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and §§

8.9A-313

and

8.9A-316 (d)

and (e) for goods covered by a certificate of title, a security interest in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements, and a security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding a change in the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.

Duration and renewal of perfection. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and §

8.9A-316 (d)

and (e), duration and renewal of perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the requirements prescribed by a statute, regulation, or treaty described in subsection (a) are governed by the statute, regulation, or treaty. In other respects, the security interest is subject to this title.

Inapplicability to certain inventory. During any period in which collateral subject to a statute specified in subsection (a) (2) is inventory held for sale or lease by a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in the business of selling goods of that kind, this section does not apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-302; 1966, c. 569; 1973, c. 509; 1983, cc. 204, 367; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “a statute of the Commonwealth” for “a certificate-of-title statute of this Commonwealth” at the beginning, and “on a certificate of title as” for “on the certificate as” near the middle, of subdivision (a)(2); and substituted “a statute” for “a certificate-of-title statute” at the beginning, and “on a certificate of title as” for “on the certificate as” near the middle, of subdivision (a)(3).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 101.3.

§ 8.9A-312.
Perfection of security interests in chattel paper, deposit accounts, documents, goods covered by documents, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, and money; perfection by permissive filing, temporary perfection without filing or transfer of possession.

Perfection by filing permitted. A security interest in chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, or investment property may be perfected by filing.

Control or possession of certain collateral. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-315 (c)

and (d) for proceeds:

a security interest in a deposit account may be perfected only by control under §

8.9A-314

;

except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-308 (d)

, a security interest in a letter-of-credit right may be perfected only by control under §

8.9A-314

; and

a security interest in money may be perfected only by the secured party’s taking possession under §

8.9A-313

.

Goods covered by negotiable document. While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a negotiable document covering the goods:

a security interest in the goods may be perfected by perfecting a security interest in the document; and

a security interest perfected in the document has priority over any security interest that becomes perfected in the goods by another method during that time.

Goods covered by nonnegotiable document. While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a nonnegotiable document covering the goods, a security interest in the goods may be perfected by:

issuance of a document in the name of the secured party;

the bailee’s receipt of notification of the secured party’s interest; or

filing as to the goods.

Temporary perfection; new value. A security interest in certificated securities, negotiable documents, or instruments is perfected without filing or the taking of possession or control for a period of 20 days from the time it attaches to the extent that it arises for new value given under an authenticated security agreement.

Temporary perfection; goods or documents made available to debtor. A perfected security interest in a negotiable document or goods in possession of a bailee, other than one that has issued a negotiable document for the goods, remains perfected for 20 days without filing if the secured party makes available to the debtor the goods or documents representing the goods for the purpose of:

ultimate sale or exchange; or

loading, unloading, storing, shipping, transshipping, manufacturing, processing, or otherwise dealing with them in a manner preliminary to their sale or exchange.

Temporary perfection; delivery of security certificate or instrument to debtor. A perfected security interest in a certificated security or instrument remains perfected for 20 days without filing if the secured party delivers the security certificate or instrument to the debtor for the purpose of:

ultimate sale or exchange; or

presentation, collection, enforcement, renewal, or registration of transfer.

Expiration of temporary perfection. After the 20-day period specified in subsection (e), (f), or (g) expires, perfection depends upon compliance with this title.

History.

1973, c. 509, § 8.9-304; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 1997, c. 343; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “or control” in the last sentence of subsection (e); and substituted “20” for “twenty” throughout the section.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 43; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 101.2, 101.3.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Creditors’ failure to perfect lien on deposit account. —

Because a debtor’s other creditors lacked any control over a deposit account garnished by a lienholder, as required by §§

8.9A-104

and

8.9A-314

, as: (1) none of the statements showed that the creditor was the bank where the deposit account was located; (2) the financing statements did not show that an agreement existed among the debtor, the secured party, and the bank; and (3) the financing statements did not show that the secured party was the bank’s customer with respect to the disputed deposit account, said creditors failed to properly perfect their interest in the account, and thus, lacked a right to claim priority over the same. Hence, the debtor’s motion seeking release of the dispute funds in said account to its other creditors was denied. Robert Half Int'l, Inc. v. Cricket Techs., LLC, 75 Va. Cir. 505, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 263 (Fairfax County Nov. 20, 2007).

§ 8.9A-313.
When possession by or delivery to secured party perfects security interest without filing.

Perfection by possession or delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a secured party may perfect a security interest in tangible negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper by taking possession of the collateral. A secured party may perfect a security interest in certificated securities by taking delivery of the certificated securities under §

8.8A-301

.

Goods covered by certificate of title. With respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued by this Commonwealth, a secured party may perfect a security interest in the goods by taking possession of the goods only in the circumstances described in §

8.9A-316 (d)

.

Collateral in possession of person other than debtor. With respect to collateral other than certificated securities and goods covered by a document, a secured party takes possession of collateral in the possession of a person other than the debtor, the secured party, or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business, when:

the person in possession authenticates a record acknowledging that it holds possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

the person takes possession of the collateral after having authenticated a record acknowledging that it will hold possession of collateral for the secured party’s benefit.

Time of perfection by possession; continuation of perfection. If perfection of a security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by a secured party, perfection occurs no earlier than the time the secured party takes possession and continues only while the secured party retains possession.

Time of perfection by delivery; continuation of perfection. A security interest in a certificated security in registered form is perfected by delivery when delivery of the certificated security occurs under §

8.8A-301

and remains perfected by delivery until the debtor obtains possession of the security certificate.

Acknowledgment not required. A person in possession of collateral is not required to acknowledge that it holds possession for a secured party’s benefit.

Effectiveness of acknowledgment; no duties or confirmation. If a person acknowledges that it holds possession for the secured party’s benefit:

the acknowledgment is effective under subsection (c) or §

8.8A-301 (a)

, even if the acknowledgment violates the rights of a debtor; and

unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this title otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to another person.

Secured party’s delivery to person other than debtor. A secured party having possession of collateral does not relinquish possession by delivering the collateral to a person other than the debtor or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business if the person was instructed before the delivery or is instructed contemporaneously with the delivery:

to hold possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

to redeliver the collateral to the secured party.

Effect of delivery under subsection (h); no duties or confirmation. A secured party does not relinquish possession, even if a delivery under subsection (h) violates the rights of a debtor. A person to which collateral is delivered under subsection (h) does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the delivery to another person unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this title otherwise provides.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-305; 1973, c. 509; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 1997, c. 343; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “tangible” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 16; 2A M.J. Assignments for the Benefit of Creditors, § 33; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 101.2.

§ 8.9A-314.
Perfection by control.

Perfection by control. A security interest in investment property, deposit accounts, letter-of-credit rights, electronic chattel paper, or electronic documents may be perfected by control of the collateral under §§

8.7-106

,

8.9A-104

,

8.9A-105

,

8.9A-106

or §

8.9A-107

.

Specified collateral; time of perfection by control; continuation of perfection. A security interest in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents is perfected by control under §§

8.7-106

,

8.9A-104

,

8.9A-105

or §

8.9A-107

when the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control only while the secured party retains control.

Investment property; time of perfection by control; continuation of perfection. A security interest in investment property is perfected by control under §

8.9A-106

from the time the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control until:

the secured party does not have control; and

one of the following occurs:

if the collateral is a certificated security, the debtor has or acquires possession of the security certificate;

if the collateral is an uncertificated security, the issuer has registered or registers the debtor as the registered owner; or

if the collateral is a security entitlement, the debtor is or becomes the entitlement holder.

History.

1996, c. 216, § 8.9-115; 2000, c. 1007; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “or electronic documents” and “8.7-106” in subsections (a) and (b); and made minor stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 50; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 101.2.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Creditors’ failure to perfect lien on deposit account. —

Because a debtor’s other creditors lacked any control over a deposit account garnished by a lienholder, as required by §§

8.9A-104

and

8.9A-314

, as: (1) none of the statements showed that the creditor was the bank where the deposit account was located; (2) the financing statements did not show that an agreement existed among the debtor, the secured party, and the bank; and (3) the financing statements did not show that the secured party was the bank’s customer with respect to the disputed deposit account, said creditors failed to properly perfect their interest in the account, and thus, lacked a right to claim priority over the same. Hence, the debtor’s motion seeking release of the dispute funds in said account to its other creditors was denied. Robert Half Int'l, Inc. v. Cricket Techs., LLC, 75 Va. Cir. 505, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 263 (Fairfax County Nov. 20, 2007).

§ 8.9A-315.
Secured party’s rights on disposition of collateral and in proceeds.

Disposition of collateral; continuation of security interest or agricultural lien; proceeds. Except as otherwise provided in this title and in §

8.2-403 (2)

:

a security interest or agricultural lien continues in collateral notwithstanding sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition thereof unless the secured party authorized the disposition free of the security interest or agricultural lien; and

a security interest attaches to any identifiable proceeds of collateral.

When commingled proceeds identifiable. Proceeds that are commingled with other property are identifiable proceeds:

if the proceeds are goods, to the extent provided by §

8.9A-336

; and

if the proceeds are not goods, to the extent that the secured party identifies the proceeds by a method of tracing, including application of equitable principles, that is permitted under law other than this title with respect to commingled property of the type involved.

Perfection of security interest in proceeds. A security interest in proceeds is a perfected security interest if the security interest in the original collateral was perfected.

Continuation of perfection. A perfected security interest in proceeds becomes unperfected on the twenty-first day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds unless:

the following conditions are satisfied:

a filed financing statement covers the original collateral;

the proceeds are collateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the office in which the financing statement has been filed; and

the proceeds are not acquired with cash proceeds;

the proceeds are identifiable cash proceeds; or

the security interest in the proceeds is perfected other than under subsection (c) when the security interest attaches to the proceeds or within twenty days thereafter.

When perfected security interest in proceeds becomes unperfected. If a filed financing statement covers the original collateral, a security interest in proceeds which remains perfected under subsection (d) (1) becomes unperfected at the later of:

when the effectiveness of the filed financing statement lapses under §

8.9A-515

or is terminated under §

8.9A-513

; or

the twenty-first day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-306; 1973, c. 509; 1983, c. 204; 1996, c. 216; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

For article, “The Purchase Money Security Interest in Inventory Versus the After-Acquired Property Interest — A ‘No Win’ Situation,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (1986).

For note, “Priority Contests Under Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code: A Purposive Interpretation of a Statutory Puzzle,” see 72 Va. L. Rev. 1155 (1986).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 101.4.

§ 8.9A-316.
Effect of change in governing law.

General rule; effect on perfection of change in governing law. A security interest perfected pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in §

8.9A-301 (1)

or

8.9A-305 (c)

remains perfected until the earliest of:

the time perfection would have ceased under the law of that jurisdiction;

the expiration of four months after a change of the debtor’s location to another jurisdiction; or

the expiration of one year after a transfer of collateral to a person that thereby becomes a debtor and is located in another jurisdiction.

Security interest perfected or unperfected under law of new jurisdiction. If a security interest described in subsection (a) becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event described in that subsection, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

Possessory security interest in collateral moved to new jurisdiction. A possessory security interest in collateral, other than goods covered by a certificate of title and as-extracted collateral consisting of goods, remains continuously perfected if:

the collateral is located in one jurisdiction and subject to a security interest perfected under the law of that jurisdiction;

thereafter the collateral is brought into another jurisdiction; and

upon entry into the other jurisdiction, the security interest is perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction.

Goods covered by certificate of title from the Commonwealth. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title which is perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction when the goods become covered by a certificate of title from the Commonwealth remains perfected until the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become so covered.

When subsection (d) security interest becomes unperfected against purchasers. A security interest described in subsection (d) becomes unperfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value if the applicable requirements for perfection under §

8.9A-311(b)

or

8.9A-313

are not satisfied before the earlier of:

the time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become covered by a certificate of title from the Commonwealth; or

the expiration of four months after the goods had become so covered.

Change in jurisdiction of bank, issuer, nominated person, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary. A security interest in deposit accounts, letter-of-credit rights, or investment property which is perfected under the law of the bank’s jurisdiction, the issuer’s jurisdiction, a nominated person’s jurisdiction, the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction, or the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction, as applicable, remains perfected until the earlier of:

the time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of that jurisdiction; or

the expiration of four months after a change of the applicable jurisdiction to another jurisdiction.

Subsection (f) security interest perfected or unperfected under law of new jurisdiction. If a security interest described in subsection (f) becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time or the end of the period described in that subsection, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of that time or the end of that period, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

Effect on filed financing statement of change in governing law. The following rules apply to collateral to which a security interest attaches within four months after the debtor changes its location to another jurisdiction:

A financing statement filed before the change pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in §

8.9A-301(1)

or

8.9A-305(c)

is effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the debtor had not changed its location.

If a security interest perfected by a financing statement that is effective under paragraph (1) becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in §

8.9A-301(1)

or

8.9A-305(c)

or the expiration of the four-month period, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

Effect of change in governing law on financing statement filed against original debtor. If a financing statement naming an original debtor is filed pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in §

8.9A-301(1)

or

8.9A-305(c)

and the new debtor is located in another jurisdiction, the following rules apply:

The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights before or within four months after the new debtor becomes bound under §

8.9A-203(d)

, if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the collateral had been acquired by the original debtor.

A security interest that is perfected by the financing statement and which becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the expiration of the four-month period or the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in §

8.9A-301(1)

or

8.9A-305(c)

remains perfected thereafter. A security interest that is perfected by the financing statement but which does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

History.

Code 1950, § 55-9; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-103; 1973, c. 509; 1984, c. 613; 1996, c. 216; 1997, c. 343; 2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “from the Commonwealth” for “from this state” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (d), added subsections (h) and (i), and minor stylistic changes.